District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.03

Knowledge and notice.

(a)

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

(b)

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

(1)

Knows of it;

(2)

Has received a notification of it; or

(3)

Has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

(c)

A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person learns of it.

(d)

A person receives a notification when the notification:

(1)

Comes to the person’s attention; or

(2)

Is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

(e)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence shall not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

(f)

A partner’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership shall be effective immediately as knowledge by notice to, or receipt of a notification by, the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

(g)

A person that is not a partner is deemed:

(1)

To know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in § 29-603.03(e); and

(2)

To have notice of:

(A)

A partner’s dissociation 90 days after a statement of dissociation under § 29-607.04 becomes effective; and

(B)

A partnership’s:

(i)

Dissolution 90 days after a statement of dissolution under § 29-608.05 becomes effective;

(ii)

Termination 90 days after a statement of termination under § 29-608.02 becomes effective; and

(iii)

Participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Chapter 2 of this title becomes effective.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(2)(B), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (g).
1981 Ed., § 41-151.2.
2001 Ed., § 33-101.02.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 102 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).